Arkansas, session 2025, SB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The Department of Human Services currently allows providers
thirty-five (35) days to appeal an adverse determination before the
determination becomes final under 20 CAR § 706-404(a)(5);
(2) The thirty-five (35) day period is overly restrictive and
does not align with the operational realities of providers' business offices,
where adverse determinations arrive via mail and require time to be reviewed,
processed, and responded to appropriately;
(3) The current notice process lacks necessary details,
*JMB310*
03-19-2025 15:13:17 JMB310

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB257
sometimes failing to include citations to specific policies, protocols, or
procedures, which hinders providers from adequately investigating and
appealing adverse decisions; and
(4) The inefficiency of the current process burdens both the
department and its contracted vendors by increasing unnecessary phone calls,
claims reopenings, and resubmissions which create additional administrative
costs and delays.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to improve efficiency and
transparency in the Medicaid provider appeals process by:
(1) Extending the appeal period for providers;
(2) Requiring that notices of adverse decisions contain
comprehensive information, including citations to applicable policies and
procedures;
(3) Mandating the publication of all policies, protocols, and
procedural requirements utilized in making adverse decisions; and
(4) Ensuring that these requirements apply to the department and
any third-party vendors administering portions of the appeals process.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1702, concerning the definitions
within the Medicaid Fairness Act, is amended to add an addition subdivision
to read as follows:
(20) “Third-party entity” means a vendor or other similar entity
contracted by the Department of Human Services to administer any part of the
Medicaid appeals process.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1705 is amended to read as follows:
20-77-1705. Explanations for adverse decisions required.
(a) Each denial or other deficiency that the Department of Human
Services makes against a Medicaid provider shall be prepared in writing and
shall specify:
(1) The nature of the adverse decision;
(2) The statutory provision or specific rule alleged to have
been violated; and
(3) The facts and grounds that form the basis for the adverse
decision.
(b) A notice of an adverse decision sent to a provider shall contain
03-19-2025 15:13:17 JMB310

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB257
at a minimum:
(1) A clear and detailed explanation of the rationale for the
adverse decision; and
(2) Citations to all specific protocols, procedures, or policy
manual references that were relied upon in making the adverse decision.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1712 is amended to read as follows:
20-77-1712. Notices.
(a) When the Department of Human Services sends letters or other forms
of notice with deadlines to providers or recipients, the deadline shall not
begin to run before the next business day following the date of the postmark
on the envelope, the facsimile transmission confirmation sheet, or the
electronic record confirmation, unless otherwise required by federal statute
or regulation.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall allow a provider no less
than sixty-five (65) days from the date of notice to the provider to appeal
an adverse decision, whether through administrative reconsideration,
administrative appeal, or any equivalent process.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 17, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
20-77-1719. Publication of protocols, procedures, and requirements.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall publish and maintain all
protocols, procedures, and requirements used in making adverse decisions on
the website of the department.
(b) The publication shall include:
(1) The current version of each protocol, procedure, or
requirement;
(2) Prior versions of each protocol, manual, or published
requirement maintained in an archive for reference for a period equivalent to
state law and rule regarding retention of medical records; and
(3) An effective date for each version of the protocol, manual,
or published requirement to ensure providers have access to historical and
current policy requirements.
(c)(1) The department shall not use or enforce any policy, protocol,
or requirement that is not publicly disclosed and accessible to providers.
03-19-2025 15:13:17 JMB310

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB257
(2) Any internal, undisclosed, or unpublished protocol,
procedure, or requirement shall be deemed invalid for the purpose of making
an adverse decision.
(3) Subdivisions (c)(1) and (c)(2) of this section do not apply
to:
(A) Any information, protocol, procedure, or requirement
for which disclosure is prohibited by state law or rule or by federal law or
regulation;
(B) Research regarding the latest medical standard of care
or advancement of practice that is conducted by the department on a specific
request for payment or claim; or
(C) Adverse actions associated with licensure or
certification of providers.

20-77-1720. Third-party entity compliance.
A third-party entity shall comply with the requirements in this
subchapter, including appeal periods, notice requirements, and publication of
protocols, procedures, and requirements.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. Implementation.
The Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Revise all policies, manuals, and procedural guidelines to
conform with this act; and
(2) Conduct periodic audits to ensure compliance with this act
and publish audit findings under this section annually.

/s/C. Penzo









03-19-2025 15:13:17 JMB310